Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.290

Applicability of courts open to all act.

The provisions of RCW 2.28.300 through 2.28.330 apply to municipal courts.

[ 2020 c 37 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—2020 c 37: See notes following RCW 2.28.300.